Hawaii statutes.
§353-7 High security correctional facility.
(a) The director shall maintain a high security correctional facility for the
residential care, correctional services, and control of high custodial risk
convicted felons or the temporary detention of high custodial risk persons
awaiting trial. The high security correctional facility may be integrated and
operated concurrently with any other correctional facility or facilities.

(b) The facility shall:

(1) Provide extensive control and correctional
programs for categories of persons who cannot be held or treated in other
correctional facilities including, but not limited to:

(A) Individuals committed because of serious
predatory or violent crimes against the person;

(B) Intractable recidivists;

(C) Persons characterized by varying degrees
of personality disorders;

(D) Recidivists identified with organized
crime; and

(E) Violent and dangerously deviant persons;

(2) Provide correctional services including, but not
limited to, psychiatric and psychological evaluation, social inventory,
correctional programming, and medical and dental services; and

(3) Provide recreational, educational, occupational
training, and social adjustment programs. [L 1987, c 338, pt of §3; am L 1989,
c 41, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next